Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5655
Commission; purpose.

The purpose of the commission shall be to advise the department, the Legislature, the Governor, the University of Nebraska, and the citizens of Nebraska regarding all aspects of rural health care and to advise the office regarding the administration of the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 729;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 154;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 55;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 627.